District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-1003

Notice of a drug free zone.

Repealed.

History

June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-270, § 4, 43 DCR 4493
May 6, 2015, D.C. Law 20-274, § 3, 61 DCR 12117

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-583.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 48-1001.